Arkansas, session 2025, SB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(e)(2)(A), concerning competitive
sealed proposals under the Arkansas Procurement Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) If discussions conducted after the deadline for the
receipt of proposals clarify one (1) or more requirements that necessitate
material revisions of proposals, each offeror determined to be responsible
and reasonably susceptible of being awarded a contract shall be provided an
opportunity to revise its proposal for the purpose of submitting a best and
final offer.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(e)(2)(C)(ii), concerning
competitive sealed proposals under the Arkansas Procurement Law, is amended
to read as follows:
(ii) In responding to a request for a best and final
offer, an offeror may:
(a) Resubmit the offeror's original proposal
*JLL154*
01/30/2025 4:34:16 PM JLL154

SB165
with lower pricing or additional benefits, or both, in accordance with the
specifications of the request for proposals; or
(b) Submit a written response that states that
the offeror's original proposal, including without limitation the pricing,
remains unchanged; or
(c) Resubmit the offeror's proposal by
revising the offeror's response to one (1) or more of the specifications of
the request for proposals.




























01/30/2025 4:34:16 PM JLL154